Tennessee, session 114, SB1966.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-6-210, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(g)
(1) The board shall initiate a criminal background check, utilizing a
method as described in § 63-1-116(a)(1), for each person licensed to practice
medicine pursuant to this chapter upon application for a renewal of licensure.
(2) Any cost associated with the required background check must be
paid by the applicant. Payments of costs required to be made by the Tennessee
bureau of investigation must be made in accordance with §§ 38-6-103 and 38-6-
109.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-7-114, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(g)
(1) The board shall initiate a criminal background check, utilizing a
method as described in § 63-1-116(a)(1), for each licensed professional nurse,
registered nurse, and licensed practical nurse upon application for a renewal of
licensure.
(2) Any cost associated with the required background check must be
paid by the applicant. Payments of costs required to be made by the Tennessee
SB1966
011371
- 1 -

bureau of investigation must be made in accordance with §§ 38-6-103 and 38-6-
109.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-9-107, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(f)
(1) The board shall initiate a criminal background check, utilizing a
method as described in § 63-1-116(a)(1), for each person licensed to practice
osteopathic medicine pursuant to this chapter upon application for a renewal of
licensure.
(2) Any cost associated with the required background check must be
paid by the applicant. Payments of costs required to be made by the Tennessee
bureau of investigation must be made in accordance with §§ 38-6-103 and 38-6-
109.
SECTION 4. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to applications for a renewal of licensure on or after that date.
- 2 - 011371